Idaho statutes. Title 6 ACTIONS IN PARTICULAR CASES
Chapter 28
LIABILITY OF OUT-OF-STATE EMERGENCY RESPONDER

Section.

§ 6-2801. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Emergency” means the occurrence or imminent threat of a condition threatening life or property which requires emergency assistance.

“Emergency responder” means a person employed by or who is a bona fide member of a governmental entity of another state of the United States including, but not limited to, a legally organized law enforcement agency, a legally organized fire department or a licensed emergency medical service provider, and whose primary duty is to serve or protect the safety or life of any person or to protect property. Emergency responder includes, but is not limited to, peace officers, firefighters, ambulance attendants, emergency medical technicians, search and rescue personnel and park rangers.

§ 6-2802. Liability of out-of-state emergency responder.

An emergency responder who enters this state in response to an emergency shall not be liable to another person for damages or injury arising from the conduct of the emergency responder in rendering services in response to an emergency unless it is shown that the emergency responder caused injury or damages to such person as a proximate result of his reckless, grossly negligent or intentional misconduct.